Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
INCORPORATION

31-2-101. Petition to district court.

Whenever the inhabitants of any territory not embraced within the limits of any existing municipality desire to be organized into a city or town, they shall file a petition for incorporation of such city or town with the district court of the county within which such territory, or any part thereof, is situate. The petition shall be signed by not less than one hundred fifty of the registered electors who are landowners and residents within the territory or, in cases where the territory involved is wholly situate in a county having a population of twenty-five thousand or less, signed by forty such registered electors who are landowners and residents and shall:

Describe the territory proposed to be embraced in such city or town, which description shall determine the boundaries thereof;

Have attached thereto an accurate map or plat thereof on a scale no less than one inch to one thousand feet;

State the name proposed for such city or town;

Be accompanied with satisfactory proofs of the number of inhabitants within the territory embraced within the limits of the proposed city or town, which proofs shall be based upon the last preceding federal census, as adjusted according to the records of the county planning office or other county records. At the time of the filing of said petition, the petitioners shall file a bond, in an amount to be determined and approved by the court, to cover the expenses connected with the proceedings in case the incorporation is not effected. In no case shall there be incorporated in such city or town any undivided tract of land consisting of forty or more acres lying within the proposed limits of such city or town without the consent of the owners thereof.

(1.5) The petition may include a request for submission to the electors of the proposed municipality at the incorporation election of any matter permitted to be submitted at the election pursuant to section 31-2-102 (1.5).

No such petition shall be filed where any portion of the boundaries of the proposed city or town is within one mile from the boundaries of any existing municipality, unless the territory proposed to be included within such city or town is composed of three hundred twenty acres or more.

(2.5) (a) In addition to any other notice that may be required under this part 1, whenever the number of registered electors within the area that is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is less than two thousand five hundred persons, notice of the filing of the petition shall be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real property within the area at the address shown for such owner in the records of the county assessor's office. The cost of mailing the notice required by this paragraph (a) shall be borne by the petitioners.

The notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) shall include the name, address, and telephone number of a contact person who is able to provide information on the petition to the public, the case number of the civil action concerning the petition, and the district court in which the petition is filed. The notice shall also inform the property owner that, if he or she would like to obtain a copy of the petition, the property owner shall submit to the contact person a request for a copy of the petition along with the payment of a fee. The notice shall specify the amount of the fee and instructions as to the manner in which payment shall be made. The fee charged pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall conform to the requirements of section 24-72-205 (5)(a), C.R.S. Upon receipt of payment, the contact person shall mail a copy of the petition to the property owner.

The notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) shall be sent prior to the date on which the district court makes its findings and determination pursuant to section 31-2-102 (1).

No incorporation election shall be held pursuant to section 31-2-102 unless the court finds that the proposed area of incorporation is urban in character and unless the court additionally finds that:

The proposed area of incorporation has an average of at least fifty registered electors residing within the boundaries of the proposed area of incorporation for each square mile of area.

Repealed.

(Repeal provision deleted by revision.)

If the proposed area of incorporation has fewer than five hundred registered electors residing therein, a public hearing shall be held before the board of county commissioners to consider whether the petitioners may hold an incorporation election. Thirty days' notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be given by one publication thereof in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

After public hearing, the board of county commissioners may refuse to permit the incorporation election to be held if the board finds upon satisfactory evidence that:

Any of the criteria set forth for special districts in section 32-1-203 (2), C.R.S., exist with respect to the area proposed for incorporation;

Annexation to a nearby municipality would avoid unnecessary duplication of the services referred to in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II); and

The proposed incorporation is inconsistent with any applicable county or regional comprehensive plan.

If the proposed area of incorporation includes more than one county, the board of county commissioners of each county included may meet and devise a procedure for a joint hearing to determine whether the petitioners may hold an incorporation election.

If, at any time between the filing of a petition pursuant to this section and not less than ten days prior to the date of the election thereon, there is filed with the court any subsequent petition which meets the requirements of this part 1 and which embraces any of the territory embraced in the initial petition calling for such election, the court may order that all such proposals contained in the said petitions filed with the court be submitted to the registered electors of the territories embraced by such petitions, to be voted on at one election, in the alternative. The court may order the rescission of any prior call of an election, discharge any commissioners previously appointed, and order the appointment of a new commission to call the election on all such proposals, or the court may order the inclusion of the subsequent proposals in the call of an election by the originally appointed commissioners.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1008, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1183, § 1, effective June 21.

L. 81:

(3)(a)(III) amended, p. 1497, § 1, effective May 27; (3)(b)(II)(A) amended, p. 1614, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 87:

IP(1) amended, p. 325, § 73, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1.5) added, p. 1190, § 86, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2.5) added, p. 49, § 1, effective September 1.

31-2-102. Incorporation election.

If the district court finds and determines that the territory described in the petition and the petition itself meet the requirements of this part 1, it shall appoint not less than five nor more than nine commissioners, who shall be registered electors residing within the territory described in the petition. Each commissioner, within ten days after his appointment, shall signify by affidavit to the court his intent to serve as commissioner. The commissioners shall hold a meeting within ten days after their acceptance and shall elect a chairman and such other officers as they may determine advisable to assist them in the performance of their duties. A majority of the commissioners appointed shall constitute a quorum at any meeting for the purpose of carrying out their legal duties. Such commissioners, within ten days following their acceptance, by resolution setting the date and time therefor, shall call an election of all the registered electors residing within the territory embraced within said territory, such election to be held not later than ninety days after the date of the call thereof, except as provided in this section. The chairman or other officer of the commissioners shall promptly report to the court, by affidavit, the provisions of the call for election.

(1.5) At any election for the incorporation of a new municipality, the commissioners shall also place upon the ballot any local government matters arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-103 (4), C.R.S., as applied to the new municipality, if the petition filed pursuant to section 31-2-101 requests that such matters be submitted at the incorporation election. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (5) of this section, any incorporation election at which a local government matter arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution is submitted shall be conducted at the time and in the manner required by section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The commissioners shall establish one or more precincts within said limits and shall designate one polling place for each precinct. The precincts shall consist of one or more whole general election precincts wherever practicable. The chairman shall forthwith certify the precinct boundaries to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such territory is located. The county clerk and recorder shall prepare a registration list for each precinct in the manner provided in the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

Registration and changes of address may be made with the county clerk and recorder. The county clerk and recorder, in his or her discretion, may conduct registration from time to time within the proposed municipal boundaries.

The notice of such an election shall be given by the commissioners in the manner prescribed by the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". Such notice shall include a description of the limits of the proposed town or city and shall state that the description and plat thereof are on file in the office of the clerk of the district court.

The commissioners shall conduct the election in conformity with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965" insofar as applicable. The commissioners shall act as judges and clerks of the election, and the chairman may appoint such additional judges and clerks of election as he deems necessary. The commissioners shall report the results of the election to the court within three days following the election. The ballots or voting machine tabs used at said election shall be "For Incorporation" and "Against Incorporation".

If more than one proposal is to be voted upon at the election and no proposal receives a majority of favorable votes, all the submitted proposals shall fail; and, if there is a tie in the number of favorable votes cast for any proposals, such proposals shall be voted upon in a runoff election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1009, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 326, § 74, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1.5) added, p. 1190, § 87, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1772, § 35, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 856, § 95, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 58, § 10, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-2-103. Approval of incorporation election.

Within three days after the election, the commissioners shall file a report thereof with the court, which report shall be verified upon the oath or affirmation of each commissioner and which shall contain the following:

A certification that the election was held in accordance with the law;

A copy of the notice of the election, as published;

The names of the judges of the election;

The whole number of votes cast in the election; and

The result declared on the proposal submitted as reflected by the votes cast for and against such proposal.

If it appears to the court that said election was substantially regular and fair and a majority of the ballots cast at such election were for incorporation, the court shall by order adjudge said petition and election to be valid. The clerk of the court shall thereupon give notice of the result by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or, if no newspaper is published in the county, by posting in five public places within the limits of the proposed city or town. In such notice he shall designate to which classification of incorporation prescribed in section 31-1-203 the city or town belongs. Three certified copies of the notice, with proper proof of its publication, together with a certified copy of all papers and record entries relating to the matter on file in the clerk of the court's office, including a legal description and a map of the area concerned, shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of each of the counties in which the territory is situate. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy of such notice with the division of local government of the department of local affairs as provided in section 24-32-109, C.R.S., and file a third certified copy of said notice in the office of the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1010, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 829, § 1, effective March 22.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-104. Organization of new city or town.

After the filing of the record in the proper offices by the clerk of the court, the commissioners mentioned in section 31-2-102, in the case of a city, by resolution, shall divide the city into wards in accordance with the provisions of section 31-4-104, and the commissioners may, in the case of a town, similarly divide such town into wards. Each ward shall contain at least one precinct, and no precinct or part thereof shall be located within more than one ward. Precinct boundaries shall be the same as those established pursuant to section 31-2-102. Said resolution shall be filed with the clerk of the district court; but the first governing body shall have authority by ordinance to change the boundaries and number of wards prior to the next regular election.

The commissioners by their chairman, at least four weeks before the date of the first election of officers, shall give preliminary notice thereof by publication in newspapers selected in the manner prescribed by the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". Such notice shall contain the following information:

The time when the election will be held and the precinct boundaries and location of the polling place for each precinct;

A description of the boundaries of the wards, if there are wards;

The officers then to be elected;

The fact that candidates for office may be nominated and their names placed on the ballot in accordance with the petition requirements set out in the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965";

The last date on which nomination petitions may be filed;

The last date registration and changes of address may be made with the county clerk and recorder; and

The qualifications for persons to vote in the election.

Registration and changes of address may be made in the office of the county clerk and recorder. The county clerk and recorder has authority in his or her sole discretion, from time to time, to conduct registration within the proposed corporate limits. Each nomination petition must be filed with the clerk of the district court. Nominating petitions shall be made and filed and vacancies in nomination shall be filled in accordance with the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

At least twenty days before the election, the commissioners by their chair shall give notice of the election in the manner prescribed by the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

At such election the registered electors of such city or town residing within the limits of such city or town shall choose officers therefor, to hold their offices until the first regular election. The commissioners shall act as judges and clerks of the election; but the chairman may appoint such additional judges and clerks as he deems necessary for the proper conduct of the election. The election shall be conducted by the commissioners in the manner prescribed by the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", insofar as applicable.

Candidates for election and elected officers shall bear the same qualifications for office as required of candidates and officers of a city or town as the case may be.

All costs and expenses connected with such incorporation proceedings, including all election expenses and fees for necessary legal expenses, shall be paid by the governing body of the newly incorporated city or town within one year from the date of incorporation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1011, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 326, § 75, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 1772, § 36, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 856, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 58, § 11, effective February 18.

L. 2015:

(4) amended, (HB 15-1130), ch. 230, p. 854, § 3, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

(3) For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1130, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

31-2-105. Incorporation complete - first ordinances - when effective.

When certified copies of the papers and record entries are made and filed, as required by section 31-2-103, and officers are elected and qualified for such city or town, as provided in section 31-2-104, the incorporation thereof shall be complete, and all courts thereafter shall take due notice of the fact of such corporate status in all judicial proceedings.

No ordinance enacted by the governing body of such city or town at the first meeting of such body shall take effect until thirty days after passage and publication, as provided in section 31-16-105.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1012, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-107 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-106. Legal incorporation - validation - dedication of public property.

Any city or town which is formed, organized, or incorporated and which exercises the rights and powers of a city or town and has in office a governing body exercising its duties is deemed legally incorporated. The legality of such formation or organization shall not be legally denied or questioned after six months from the date thereof; it is deemed a legally incorporated city or town; and its formation, organization, or incorporation shall not thereafter be questioned.

All cities and towns organized pursuant to the general laws of this state prior to July 1, 1975, are hereby validated, and the proceedings adopted therein, and obligations incurred by such cities and towns are hereby validated and confirmed.

All streets, parks, and other places designated or described as for public use on the map or plat of any city or town are public property, and the fee title thereto is vested in such city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1012, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-1-108 and 31-1-109 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-2-107. Adoption of home rule charter upon incorporation.

A city or town may be organized as a home rule city or town upon incorporation, in which event the form of the petition and the proceedings attendant upon the election of commissioners and other matters relating thereto shall be governed by the provisions of section 31-2-209.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1013, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-111 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-108. Continued county services.

The county within which any newly incorporated city or town, or any part thereof, lies and the officers thereof shall continue to perform all duties and responsibilities within such territory as required by law and shall:

Continue to apply all zoning, subdivision, and other regulations within the municipal limits of such city or town for a period of ninety days after the election of officers in accordance with section 31-2-104 or until superseded by ordinance, whichever is sooner; and

Continue to provide to such territory and its inhabitants, upon request by the governing body of such city or town, the same services it was providing, which services shall be continued to be rendered until the ad valorem taxes levied by such city or town for the rendering of such services are collected and become available, but in no event for a period longer than one year subsequent to the date of the city's or town's incorporation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1013, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-1-107 and 31-1-110 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-2-109. Assessment - taxes - collection.

When any municipality incorporates under the provisions of this title or any municipality reorganizes under the provisions of part 3 of this article after the time for making the annual assessment for taxation has passed, the governing body of each such city or town may provide, by ordinance or resolution, for the assessment of taxable property within the corporate limits of said city or town. When such assessment is made and approved by the governing body, it may proceed to levy the necessary taxes for the fiscal year, which levy shall be certified by the clerk of such city or town to the county assessor, who shall extend the same upon the tax list of the current year, as required by section 31-20-104. The county treasurer shall proceed in the collection of such taxes in all respects as provided by law for the collection of taxes in cities and towns. It is not necessary for any such city or town to pass the annual appropriation ordinance or resolution required by section 29-1-108, C.R.S. This section shall apply only to the assessment and collection of taxes for the first fiscal year after such incorporation or reorganization.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1013, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1435, § 3, effective January 1, 1991.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-4-109 as it existed prior to 1975.